Hawaii statutes.
[§489M-1] Definitions. As used
in this chapter:

"International trade agreement" means
a trade agreement or memorandum of agreement between the United States
government and a foreign nation, whether bilateral, multilateral, global, or
regional, to which the State, at the request of the United States government,
is a covered procuring entity; provided the term shall not include a trade
agreement or memoranda of agreement:

(1) Between the State and a foreign nation or its
sub-national entity to which the United States government is not a party; or

(2) Between a county and a foreign nation or its
sub-national entity to which the United States government is not a party.

"Procurement" means any provision of
chapter 103D. [L Sp 2007, c 1, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next